California statutes. Water Code
Violation of this section shall be punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not to exceed six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment. Each day of operation of a water-producing facility in violation hereof shall constitute a separate offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 416.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

60343.

If another public entity, or public entities, or a watermaster, or watermasters, appointed in one or more court adjudications, or any combination of the foregoing (hereafter “other regulator or regulators”) is monitoring by appropriate means the water production of substantially all water producers within the district, the board may, by resolution, indefinitely suspend the date for affixing a water-measuring device as referenced in Section 60342.

The suspension does not affect any requirements of any other regulator or regulators. The suspension may be revoked, and the date for affixing water measuring devices established, by further board resolution.

All resolutions adopted under this section shall be published in the district pursuant to Section 6006 of the Government Code. In the case of any revocation, the publication shall be completed not less than two months prior to the operative date of the revocation. In the case of any revocation, notice of the operative date shall be given by first-class mail, postage prepaid, to operators at any address of record within the district within the time required for publication, but no defect in or failure to mail the notice to any operator affects the operative date of the revocation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 536, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Adjudication [60350. - 60352.]

60350.

Commencing with the third fiscal year following a final adjudication of all or substantially all of the rights to extract ground water and a determination of the natural safe yield of the ground water supplies within the district, and a determination of the amount or extent to which the rights to extract ground water so adjudicated may be exercised without exceeding the natural safe yield of such ground water supplies, the board of such district shall recognize such judicial determination by exempting from replenishment assessments the amount of water pumped by each person whose rights have been so adjudicated which does not exceed his proportionate share of the natural safe yield of the ground water supplies of the district, as so adjudicated from time to time by the court having jurisdiction over such adjudication proceeding. The replenishment assessment shall thenceforth be levied on each producer by multiplying the production in acre-feet of ground water so produced by such producer’s water-producing facility in excess of his said adjudicated share of the natural safe yield by the rate of the replenishment assessment fixed and levied by the board for the fiscal year in which such production shall occur.

Upon such final adjudication, the board may, and within 90 days after receipt of a written notice from a producer shall, by resolution make a determination whether the adjudication will invoke the provisions of this section as of the beginning of the third fiscal year. Such determination is subject at any time to review de novo by any court of competent jurisdiction in any action for declaratory relief, or other appropriate action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 253.)
-------------------------------------------

60351.

To the extent that ground water supplies are replenished under this act no person shall acquire any property or other right in the waters distributed by the district for replenishment purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60352.

To the extent that the replenishment assessment after adjudication hereunder shifts from all producers to those who extract water in excess of their respective shares of the natural safe yield of the ground water supplies within the district as so adjudicated, such replenishment assessment shall be deemed to benefit those persons who continue to pump and extract ground water in excess of their adjudicated shares of the natural safe yield. Inasmuch as such persons must buy supplemental water or be in contempt of the court’s order limiting their extraction of ground water, they shall be deemed to benefit by the payment of a replenishment assessment which is used to purchase water to supplement the natural supplies of ground water available for use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7. CHANGES IN ORGANIZATION [60370. - 60449.]



  CHAPTER 1. Inclusion [60370. - 60388.]

60370.

Any territory including unincorporated territory or incorporated territory or a part of either, and lying within one or more counties of this State may be annexed to a water replenishment district under the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60371.

A petition, which may consist of any number of separate instruments, shall be filed with the secretary of the district, signed by registered voters residing within the boundaries of the area proposed to be annexed equal in number to at least 10 per centum of the number of such voters residing within the area so proposed to be annexed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60372.

Such petition shall set forth and describe the boundaries of the area proposed to be annexed and shall contain a prayer that such area be annexed to such district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60373.

The text of such petition and a notice stating the time of the meeting at which the same will be presented shall be published in the affected county pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code. When contained upon one or more instruments, one copy only of such petition need be published. No more than five of the names attached to the petition need appear in the publication of the petition and notice, but the number of signers shall be stated. Publication shall be complete at least seven, but not more than 28, days before the time at which the petition is to be presented to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

60374.

Within 10 days of the date of filing of such petition the secretary of the district shall examine the same and ascertain whether or not such petition is signed by the requisite number of voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60375.

When the secretary of the district has completed his examination of the petition, he shall attach to the same his certificate, properly dated, showing the result of such examination, and if from such examination he shall find that said petition is signed by the requisite number of voters or is not so signed, he shall certify that the same is sufficient or insufficient, as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60376.

If, by the certificate of the secretary of the district, the petition is found to be insufficient, he shall also certify to the number of voters required to make such petition sufficient, and it may be amended by filing a supplemental petition or petitions within 10 days of the date of such certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60377.

The secretary of the district shall, within 10 days after the filing of such supplemental petition or petitions, make like examination of the same and certify to the result of such examination as hereinbefore provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60378.

If his certificate shall show any such petition, or such petition as amended, to be insufficient, it shall be filed by him with the board of the district and kept as a public record, without prejudice, however, to the filing of a new petition to the same effect, but if, by the certificate of the secretary, such petition, or petition as amended, is shown to be sufficient, the secretary shall present the same to the board without delay.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60379.

If any supplemental petition be filed, all the signatures appended to the petition or to the supplemental petition or petitions shall be considered in determining the number of voters signing the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60380.

After an election for the annexation of such area to the district the sufficiency of such petition in any respect shall not be subject to judicial review or be otherwise questioned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60381.

Such petition may be granted by ordinance of the board of such district. No petition for inclusion may be granted unless and until the board finds that the persons and property within the territory proposed to be included will benefit directly or indirectly from the use of or right to use the ground water supplies within the district and the replenishment thereof. The petition may be granted in its entirety or only as to the part of the territory proposed to be included for which such a finding of benefit is made. If the petition be denied, either as to the whole or part of the territory to be included, no new petition for the inclusion of such territory shall be filed within six months after such denial. In granting such petition, such board of directors may fix in said ordinance the terms and conditions upon which such annexation may occur, and such terms and conditions may provide, among other things, for the levy by such district of special taxes upon the real property and improvements thereon, but not on personal property within such annexed area or areas in addition to the taxes elsewhere in this act authorized to be levied by such district, and in case such terms and conditions shall provide for the levy of such special taxes, the board, in fixing such terms and conditions, shall specify the aggregate amount to be so raised and the number of years prescribed for raising such aggregate sum and that substantially equal annual levies will be made for the purpose of raising such sum over the period so prescribed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60382.

If such petition is granted, the proposition of such annexation subject to the terms and conditions so fixed, shall be submitted to the vote of the voters in the proposed addition, at an election called by the board and held, as herein provided, within 70 days after the effective date of such ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60383.

Notice of such election shall be published in the affected county pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code. Publication shall be complete at least seven, but not more than 28, days prior to the date fixed for such election. Such notice shall describe the boundaries of the area or areas so proposed to be annexed and shall designate such territory by some appropriate name, or other words of identification, by which such territory may be referred to and indicated upon the ballot to be used at any election at which the question of such annexation is submitted, as in this act provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

60384.

Such notice also shall contain the substance of the terms and conditions fixed by the board of directors, as herein provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60385.

The measure so submitted at such election shall be stated on the ballot substantially as follows: “Shall ____ (giving the name or other designation of the territory proposed to be annexed, as stated in the notice of election) be annexed to ____ (name of water replenishment district) subject to the terms and conditions fixed by the board of directors of said district?” To the right of or below the proposition, the words “yes” and “no” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 62.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

60386.

The board shall canvass the votes cast at such election and, if such proposition is approved by a majority of the voters voting thereon at such election, the president and secretary of the board of directors shall certify that fact to the Secretary of State and shall record a certificate stating that such proposition was adopted with the county recorder of each affected county in which such district is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

60387.

Upon receipt of such last-mentioned certificate, the Secretary of State shall, within 10 days, issue his certificate reciting the passage of said ordinance and the addition of said area or areas to said district. A copy of said certificate shall be transmitted to, and filed with, the county clerk of each affected county in which such district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60388.

From and after the date of such certificate, the area or areas named therein shall be deemed added to, and shall form a part of, said district, and the taxable property therein shall be subject to taxation thereafter for the purposes of said district, including the payment of bonds and other obligations of such district at the time authorized or outstanding, and the board of the district shall be empowered to do all things necessary to enforce and make effective the terms and conditions of annexation fixed as hereinabove authorized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Exclusion [60400. - 60417.]

60400.

Territory included within any district may be excluded from such district and the parcels so to be excluded need not be contiguous one with the other.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60401.

A petition, which may consist of any number of separate instruments, shall be filed with the secretary of the district, signed by voters residing within the boundaries of the area proposed to be excluded equal in number to at least ten (10) per centum of the number of such voters voting for all candidates for the Office of Governor of this State at the last general election prior to the filing of such petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60402.

Such petition shall set forth and describe the boundaries of the area proposed to be excluded, shall state the reason for proposing such exclusion, and shall contain a prayer that such area be excluded from the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60403.

Within ten (10) days of the date of the filing of such petition the secretary of the district shall examine the same and ascertain whether or not such petition is signed by the requisite number of voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60404.

When the secretary of the district has completed his examination of the petition, he shall attach to the same his certificate, properly dated, showing the result of such examination; and if from such examination he shall find that said petition is signed by the requisite number of voters, or is not so signed, he shall certify that the same is sufficient or insufficient, as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60405.

If, by the certificate of the secretary of the district, the petition is found to be insufficient, he shall also certify to the number of voters required to make such petition sufficient, and it may be amended by filing a supplemental petition or petitions within ten (10) days of the date of such certificate. The secretary of the district shall, within ten (10) days after the filing of such supplemental petition or petitions, make like examination of the same and certify to the result of such examination as hereinbefore provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60406.

If any supplemental petition be filed, all the signatures appended to the petition or to the supplemental petition or petitions shall be considered in determining the number of voters signing the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60407.

If his certificate shall show any such petition, or such petition as amended, to be insufficient, it shall be filed by him with the board of the district and kept as a public record, without prejudice, however, to the filing of a new petition to the same effect, but if, by the certificate of the secretary, such petition, or petition as amended, is shown to be sufficient, the secretary shall present the same to the board without delay.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60408.

The text of such petition and a notice stating the time of the meeting at which the same will be presented shall be published in the district pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code. When contained upon more than one instrument, one copy only of such petition need be published. No more than five of the names attached to the petition need appear in such publication of the petition and notice, but the number of signers shall be stated. Publication shall be complete at least seven, but not more than 28, days before the time at which the petition is to be presented to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

60409.

After an election for the exclusion of such area from the district the sufficiency of such petition in any respect shall not be subject to judicial review or be otherwise questioned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60410.

The board of any district, by resolution, may initiate proceedings for the exclusion of territory from such district. Such resolution shall describe the boundaries of the area proposed to be excluded, shall state that neither the persons nor property within the area proposed to be excluded benefit directly or indirectly from the use of or right to use the ground water supplies within the district and the replenishment thereof, shall require all persons interested in the proposed exclusion to appear before the board and be heard as to why said area should not be so excluded, shall fix the time of the meeting of the board at which the persons so interested will be heard, and shall direct the secretary of the district to give notice thereof. The secretary thereupon shall cause the text of said resolution and a notice of the time and place of said hearing to be published in the district pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code. Publication shall be complete at least seven, but not more than 28, days before the time so fixed for the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

60411.

After an election for the exclusion of such area from the district the sufficiency of such resolution shall not be subject to judicial review or be otherwise questioned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60412.

If the proceedings for exclusion have been initiated by petition, such petition may be granted by ordinance of the board of directors of such district. If such proceedings have been initiated by resolution, the board shall hear all persons interested in the proposed exclusion who appear at the hearing, which may be adjourned from time to time, and after the conclusion of the hearing, the board may determine by ordinance that such area should be excluded from the district. No petition for exclusion may be granted and no ordinance of exclusion adopted by the board if such proceedings have been initiated by resolution unless and until the board finds that neither the persons nor property within the area proposed to be excluded benefit directly or indirectly from the use of or right to use the ground water supplies within the district and the replenishment thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60413.

If such petition is granted, or if such determination is made, the proposition of such exclusion shall be submitted to the vote of the voters within the area proposed to be excluded, at an election called by the board and held, as herein provided, within 70 days after the effective date of such ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60414.

Notice of the election shall be published in the district pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code. Publication shall be complete at least 7, but not more than 28, days prior to the date fixed for the election. The notice shall describe the boundaries of the area so proposed to be excluded and shall designate the area by some appropriate name, or other words of identification, by which the area may be referred to and indicated upon the ballot to be used at any election at which the question of the exclusion is submitted, as in this act provided. The measure so submitted at the election
 shall be stated on the ballot substantially as follows:

“Shall ____ (giving the name or other designation of the area proposed to be excluded, as stated in the notice of election) be excluded from ____ (name of water replenishment district)?” To the right of or below the proposition, the words “yes” and “no” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 63.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

60415.

The board shall canvass the votes cast at such election and, if the proposition is approved by a majority of the voters voting thereon at such election, the president and secretary of the board of directors shall certify that fact to the Secretary of State and shall record a certificate stating that such proposition was adopted with the county recorder of each affected county in which the district is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

60416.

Upon receipt of such last-mentioned certificate, the Secretary of State shall, within 10 days, issue his certificate reciting the passage of said ordinance and the exclusion of said area from the district. A copy of said certificate shall be transmitted to, and filed with, the county clerk of each affected county in which such district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60417.

From and after the date of such certificate, the area named therein shall be deemed excluded from, and shall no longer form a part of, said district, but the taxable property within such excluded area shall continue taxable by such district for the purpose of paying the bonded or other indebtedness of such district outstanding or contracted for at the time of such exclusion and until such bonded or other indebtedness shall have been satisfied, to the same extent that such property would be taxable for such purpose if such exclusion had not occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Consolidation [60420. - 60420.]

60420.

A district may be consolidated in the same manner as is provided for the consolidation of county water districts in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 32650) of Part 8 of Division 12.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Disincorporation [60430. - 60449.]

60430.

A petition may be filed with the county elections official of the principal county in which the district is located, signed by at least 25 percent of the voters of the district applying for disorganization and disincorporation of the district, and briefly stating the reasons therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 186.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

60431.

Upon the filing of a petition the county elections official shall examine the petition within 30 days and ascertain whether or not the petition is signed by the requisite number of voters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 187.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

60432.

When the county clerk has completed his examination of the petition he shall attach to the same his certificate properly dated, showing the result of such examination, and if from such examination he shall find that said petition is signed by the requisite number of voters residing within the boundaries of such district, or is not so signed, he shall certify that the same is sufficient or insufficient, as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60433.

After an election for the disincorporation of a district hereunder the sufficiency of such petition in any respect shall not be subject to judicial review or be otherwise questioned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60434.

If by the certificate of the county elections official the petition is shown to be sufficient, the county elections official of the principal county shall present the petition to the board of supervisors of the principal county without delay. When the petition is presented by the county elections official, the board of supervisors shall give notice of an election to be held in the district for the purpose of determining whether or not the petition shall be disincorporated and dissolved; provided, however, that in the event the district shall have issued bonds, the board of supervisors shall not consider the petition or take any action hereunder until evidence shall be furnished showing the bonds to have been fully satisfied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 188.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

60435.

Said notice of election shall be published pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code in a newspaper published in said district and determined by said board most likely to give notice to those interested in said hearing. Publication shall be complete at least seven, but not more than 28, days prior to the date fixed for the election. The notice shall state that the question of disincorporating said corporation shall be submitted to the voters of said district at the time appointed for such election, and voters shall be invited thereby to vote upon the proposition by placing upon their ballots the cross as provided by law after the words “for disincorporation” or ”against disincorporation.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

60436.

The board of supervisors shall cause a copy of said notice to be mailed by the clerk of said board to each of the directors of said district, within five days after the date of the first publication thereof, and no election shall be had until proof of such mailing is furnished by affidavit of the clerk of said board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60437.

Such election shall be held and conducted in the same manner as the election on the organization of said district, as nearly as practicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60438.

Within seven days after the date of said election, the board of supervisors shall proceed to canvass the vote cast thereat; if it be found by the canvass of said votes that less than a majority of the votes cast were in favor of disincorporation, said board of supervisors shall declare the petition for disincorporation denied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60439.

In case it should appear from said canvass of said votes that a majority of all the votes cast were in favor of disincorporation, said board of supervisors shall make and cause to be entered upon the records of their proceedings an order that the petition for such disincorporation be granted, and declaring that such water replenishment district be disincorporated; said order to take effect at the time hereinafter provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60440.

The board of supervisors shall in case the district is disincorporated, forthwith cause its county elections official to make and transmit to the Secretary of State a certified copy of the notice of election hereinbefore provided for, and a statement of the number of voters voting against the disincorporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 189.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

60441.

Twenty days from and after the holding of the election, in case a majority of said votes were cast in favor of said disincorporation, said district shall be forever disincorporated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60442.

Upon the disincorporation of any district in the manner hereinbefore provided for, the board of supervisors shall forthwith, after ascertaining by said canvass that the disincorporation has been carried, determine the amount of the indebtedness of said district, the amount of money in the treasury thereof and all indebtedness due or coming due the said district, and the directors of said district shall furnish the said board of supervisors with a statement showing said amount of indebtedness, the said amount of money in the treasury and all indebtedness due or coming due said district, and said district shall before the expiration of 30 days turn over to the treasurer of said county all moneys of said district in his possession, and said county treasurer shall place said money in a special fund to be drawn upon as hereinafter provided for.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60443.

Upon the disincorporation of said district every public officer of said district shall immediately turn over to the board of supervisors of the principal county in which said district is situated, all public property of every nature and description in their possession, and including all public records and data of every nature and description.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60444.

Nothing contained in this act shall be held to relieve said district, or the territory included within it, from any liability or any debt contracted by said district prior to its disincorporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60445.

All warrants for said indebtedness shall be drawn on order of the board of supervisors of the principal county in which said district is situated, on the fund hereinabove provided for in the county treasury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60446.

All moneys paid into the county treasury under the provisions of this act shall be placed in the special fund hereinbefore provided for. If at any time after the disincorporation of said district it shall be found that there is not sufficient money in the treasury to the credit of the fund hereinbefore provided, with which to pay any indebtedness of said district, said board of supervisors shall have the power, and it shall be their duty, to levy upon, and there shall be collected from, the property within the territory formerly included within said district subject to taxation for the indebtedness, a tax or taxes sufficient in amount to pay the said indebtedness as the same shall become due; such tax or taxes, assessments and collections shall be made in the same manner and at the same time that other taxes of each affected county are levied and collected, and they shall be an additional tax within said territory for the payment of said debts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60447.

If after payment of all debts of said district there shall remain any surplus in the hands of said county treasurer to the credit of the fund hereinbefore mentioned, the board of supervisors shall appropriate said surplus and declare a dividend pro rata to the taxpayers of said district duly paid, and said taxpayers shall have the right to have the amount of such pro rata dividends refunded to them on demand, and the said board of supervisors shall refund such pro rata to said taxpayers and each thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60448.

The board of supervisors of the principal county in which any such district has been disincorporated, shall have the power and it shall be the duty of said board, if the board of directors of such district shall fail or refuse to return to said board the statement of said amounts as hereinbefore in this act provided, to ascertain the indebtedness, other than the bonded indebtedness, of said district at the time of its disincorporation, the amount of money in its treasury and the amount due it at the said time; said board of supervisors shall make provision for the collection of the amounts due to said district, for the closing up of its affairs, and any act or acts necessary for said purposes not otherwise herein provided for, shall upon the order of said board of supervisors directing the same, be as fully done and performed and with as full effect as if the same had been performed by the proper officers of said district before disincorporation, and said county shall succeed to and possess all the right of said district in and to said indebtedness, and shall have the power to sue for or otherwise collect any such debts in the name of said county, and all costs and expenses of ascertaining the facts hereinbefore mentioned, and all other costs and expenses incurred by the board of supervisors in the execution of the orders and duties of said board of supervisors provided for in this act, shall be paid out of the special fund in this act provided for.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60449.

It is the intent of the Legislature that no district shall be disincorporated until all bonded indebtedness shall have been fully paid, and by the word “indebtedness” as used herein is meant all indebtedness other than said bonded indebtedness unless the latter is expressly used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8. COMPETITIVE BIDDING [60600. - 60622.]

60600.

This part applies to contracts by water replenishment districts established pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 888, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

60602.

(a) An expenditure for the erection, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement of a public structure or building of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more shall be let by contract by formal bidding procedure, consistent with the applicable provisions of the Public Contract Code.

(b) The district shall adopt policies and procedures, including formal and informal bidding requirements, governing contracts for professional services, materials, supplies, and
 equipment, provided that private architectural, landscape architectural, engineering, environmental, land surveying, or construction project management firms shall be selected pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 4525) of Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 891, Sec. 2.   (SB 1476)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 3 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 891.)
-------------------------------------------

60602.

(a) Before making any contract totaling twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more within any 12-month period, the district shall advertise for bids.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if a proposed expenditure described in the annual district budget for any item of supplies or services equals or exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), the district shall advertise for bids before making any contract for that item during the year to which that budget applies.

(c) This section does not apply to any of the following contracts:

(1) The
 recruitment, hiring, and dismissal of district employees and officers.

(2) Contracts with other public entities pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 60230.

(3) Contracts for which only per diem and travel expenses are paid and there is no payment for services rendered.

(4) Contracts solely for the purpose of retaining expert witnesses for litigation.

(5) Contracts for proprietary information or systems.

(6) Contracts for professional services, including, but not limited to, architectural, engineering, environmental, land surveying, or construction project management services, that are let on the basis of
 demonstrated competence and on the professional qualifications necessary for the satisfactory performance of the services required pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 4525) of Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(7) Contracts for legal services that are let on the basis of demonstrated competence and on the professional qualifications necessary for the satisfactory performance of the services.

(d) The district may adopt other procurement, advertising, and bidding rules that are more restrictive than those contained in the Public Contract Code and those more restrictive rules shall govern the procurement, advertising, and bidding practices of the district.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2028.

(History: Repealed (in Sec 2) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 891, Sec. 3.   (SB 1476)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

60604.

(a) For any improvement or unit of work done by district personnel, the estimated cost of the work shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), except under either of the following circumstances:

(1) The work consists of maintenance work, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 22002 of the Public Contract Code.

(2) The work consists of emergency work.
